Massachusetts, session 194th, S2467.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 7, clause forty-third of chapter 4 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking clause forty-third in its entirety and inserting in 
place thereof the following:-  
"Forty-third, ''Veteran'' shall mean (1) a person who served on active duty in the 
Uniformed Services or on full time national guard or reserve duty, under Titles 10 or 32 of the 
United States Code or under sections 38, 40 and 41 of chapter 33, and (2) who was discharged or 
released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable; (3)  a member of the American 
Merchant Marine who served in armed conflict between December 7, 1941 and December 31, 
1946, and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable; 
(4) a member of the reserve component who has served s minimum of six years as an active 
drilling member of the reserve component; or (5) any person who served in the Uniformed 

of 2 12 Services, and was awarded a service-connected disability by the U.S. Veterans Administration or 
who died in such service under conditions other than dishonorable shall be deemed a veteran.  
“Active Duty” shall include (1) full time service; and (2) any period of active or inactive 
duty for training during which the individual was disabled or died.  
“Armed Forces” shall include army, marine corps, navy, air force, space force, coast 
guard and any additional military service created by the U.S. Department of Defense including 
reserve components thereof.    
“Uniformed Services” shall include armed forces, commissioned corps of the public 
health service and commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration. 
None of the following shall be deemed to be a ''veteran'': 
(a) Any person who at the time of entering into the armed forces of the United States had 
declared his intention to become a subject or citizen of the United States and withdrew his 
intention under the provisions of the act of Congress approved July ninth, nineteen hundred and 
eighteen. 
(b) Any person who was discharged from the said armed forces on his own application or 
solicitation by reason of his being an enemy alien. 
(c) Any person who has been proved guilty of willful desertion. 
(d) Any person whose only service in the armed forces of the United States consists of his 
service as a member of the coast guard auxiliary or as a temporary member of the coast guard 
reserve, or both. 
(e) Any person whose last discharge or release from the armed forces is dishonorable."